Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 150 Fish and Wildlife Resources
150.722.
Authorized methods of disposal of cervid carcass material and waste by cervid meat processors, butchers or meat processors, and licensed taxidermists.

As used in this section:

“Butcher or meat processor” means any person or business entity that:

Butchers or makes meat products from meat that is amenable under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. secs. 601 et seq., and is not exempt from mandatory inspection by the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food Safety and Inspection Service; and

Has been inspected and passed under voluntary Food Safety and Inspection Service inspection; and

“Cervid meat processor” means any person or business entity that:

Butchers or makes meat products from meat that is not amenable under the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. secs. 601 et seq., and is exempt from mandatory inspection by the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food Safety and Inspection Service;

Has not been inspected and passed under voluntary Food Safety and Inspection Service inspection; and

Is paid to butcher or make meat products for human consumption from ten (10) or more animals that are members of the animal family Cervidae per calendar year.

Cervid meat processors, butchers or meat processors, and licensed taxidermists shall dispose of any unused cervid carcass material or cervid waste produced as a result of butchering, making meat products, or preparing, stuffing, or mounting wildlife by:

Burying the carcass and all of its parts and products in the earth at a point which is never covered with the overflow of ponds or streams and which is not less than one hundred (100) feet distant from any watercourse, sinkhole, well, spring, public highway, residence, or stable. The carcass shall be placed in an opening in the earth at least four (4) feet deep, the abdominal and thoracic cavities opened wide their entire length, and the entire carcass covered with two (2) inches of quicklime and at least three (3) feet of earth;

Removal of the carcass by a duly licensed rendering establishment; or

Deposition of the carcass in a contained landfill approved pursuant to KRS Chapter 224.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2020 ch. 115, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.